Louisiana, session 2026, HB783.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:4743(14) through (18) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
3:4743(19) and 4744.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4743. Definitions
As used in this Part:
* * *
(14) "Non-lactational dairy protein product" means a food product
containing dairy-identical or dairy-derived proteins produced through microbial
fermentation and not derived from the natural lactation of a mammal.
(14) (15) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, corporation, trust, firm, company, or other
entity doing business in Louisiana.
(15) (16) "Pork" means the flesh of a domesticated swine that is edible by
humans.
(16) (17) "Pork product" means a type of agricultural product that is edible
by humans and produced in whole or in part from pork, including bacon, bratwurst,
ground pork, ham, pork chops, ribs, roast, and sausage.
(17) (18) "Poultry" means domesticated birds that are edible by humans.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 783 ENROLLED
(18) (19) "Rice" means the whole or broken kernels obtained from the species
Oryza sativa L. or Oryza glaberrima, or wild rice, which is obtained from one of the
four species of grasses from the genus Zizania or Porteresia.
* * *
§4744.1. Labeling of non-lactational dairy protein products
A.(1) Any non-lactation dairy protein product offered for sale within this
state shall bear a clear and conspicuous disclosure statement that reads: "Produced
through microbial fermentation. Not derived from mammalian lactation."
(2) The disclosure shall also meet all of the following requirements:
(a) Appear on the principal display panel.
(b) Be in a font size not less than thirty-point type.
(c) Be in a typeface and color that contrast with the background.
(d) Be placed in close proximity to the product name.
Section 2. R.S. 3:4744(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4744. Applicability; prohibited activities
* * *
C.(1) No person, firm, or corporation shall manufacture for sale, sell, hold
or offer for sale, or distribute any non-lactational dairy protein product in this state.
(2) No non-lactational dairy protein product shall be labeled or marketed as
milk, cheese, yogurt, butter, ice cream, or any other dairy product intended for
human consumption.
(3) Any violation of this Section shall constitute a violation of this Part and
shall be subject to all enforcement authority, penalties, and remedies otherwise
provided by law.
Section 3. The provisions of Sections 1 and 4 and this Section of this Act shall
become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and
subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 783 ENROLLED
Section 4. The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall take effect if and when the
Act which originated as House Bill No. 512 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature
is enacted and becomes effective.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.